Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-353
Policies; department may inspect.

The Department of Insurance and its employees shall have the right at any time to inspect any policy covering any risk in this state. Every policyholder shall procure and exhibit any policy in his possession or control when required for the inspection of the department or its assistants or employees.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 68, p. 423;

R.S.1913, § 3204;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. IV, § 38, p. 603;

C.S.1922, § 7803;

C.S.1929, § 44-338;

R.S.1943, § 44-353.